Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. LEGISLATURE

CHAPTER 301. LEGISLATIVE ORGANIZATION

SUBCHAPTER A. INITIAL MEETING AND ORGANIZATION

Sec. 301.001. TIME AND PLACE OF MEETING. The legislature shall convene at the seat of government in regular session at 12 noon on the second Tuesday in January of each odd-numbered year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.002. WHO MAY ORGANIZE. (a) The following individuals only may organize the senate:

(1) senators who have not completed their terms of office; and

(2) individuals who have received certification of election to the senate.

(b) Only the individuals who have received certification of election to the house of representatives may organize the house of representatives.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.003. PRESIDING OFFICERS. (a) The secretary of state shall attend and preside at the organization of the house of representatives.

(b) If there is no secretary of state or if the secretary of state is absent or unable to attend, the attorney general shall attend and preside at the organization of the house of representatives.

(c) The lieutenant governor shall attend and preside at the organization of the senate. If the lieutenant governor is absent or unable to attend, the lieutenant governor may designate a member of the senate who is entitled to organize the senate under Section 301.002(a)(1) to preside.

(d) If there is no lieutenant governor, the senator with the greatest number of years of cumulative service as a member of the senate who is entitled to organize the senate under Section 301.002(a)(1) shall preside.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.004. TEMPORARY OFFICERS; DUTIES. (a) If the secretary of the senate for the previous session is present, that individual shall act as temporary secretary of the senate. If the chief clerk of the house of representatives for the previous session is present, the secretary of state shall appoint that individual to act as temporary chief clerk. The presiding officer of each house of the legislature shall appoint any temporary officers necessary to ensure the organization of the legislature.

(b) Under the direction of the presiding officer, the secretary of the senate or chief clerk shall call the districts of the appropriate house in numerical order regardless of whether the secretary of state has received the election returns for each district.

(c) If an individual appears at the call and presents proper evidence of the individual's election, the individual shall be admitted or qualified as if the individual's election returns had been made to the secretary of state.

(d) After the secretary of the senate has called the districts and the senators-elect have appeared and presented their credentials, the official oath shall be administered to each senator-elect by an officer authorized by law to administer oaths.

(e) After the chief clerk has called the districts and the members-elect of the house of representatives have appeared and presented their credentials, the chief clerk shall administer the official oath to each member-elect.

(f) The presiding officer of each house shall ensure that a journal of the proceedings of that house is kept.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.005. LACK OF QUORUM. If a quorum is not present in a house of the legislature on the day the legislature is to convene, the presiding officer of that house and the secretary of the senate or chief clerk, as appropriate, shall attend each day until a quorum appears and is qualified.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.006. SELECTION OF OFFICERS. (a) Immediately after election of the speaker of the house of representatives under Section 302.001, the speaker shall take the chair.

(b) After the speaker takes the chair, the house of representatives shall choose necessary officers and the speaker shall administer the official oath to them.

(c) After the senators-elect have taken the official oath, the senate shall choose necessary officers, and the lieutenant governor or an officer authorized by law to administer oaths shall administer the official oath to those officers.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. COMMITTEES AND COMMITTEE PROCEDURE

Sec. 301.011. SHORT TITLE. This subchapter may be cited as the Legislative Reorganization Act of 1961.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.012. PURPOSE. The legislature believes that it must conduct its activities on a full-time and continuing basis in order to achieve efficiency and continuity in performing its duties. It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize legislative committees and other legislative instrumentalities to work and meet their responsibilities regardless of whether the legislature is in session.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.013. SELECTION OF COMMITTEES. (a) In its rules of procedure or in a simple resolution, each house may determine the number, composition, function, membership, and authority of its committees.

(b) By concurrent resolution, the two houses may determine the number, composition, function, membership, and authority of joint committees.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.014. POWERS AND DUTIES OF STANDING COMMITTEES. (a) Each standing committee shall:

(1) conduct a continuing study of any matter within its jurisdiction and of the instrumentalities of government administering or executing the matter;

(2) examine the administration and execution of all laws relating to matters within its jurisdiction;

(3) conduct investigations to collect adequate information and materials necessary to perform its duties; and

(4) recommend to the appropriate house any legislation the committee believes is necessary and desirable.

(b) Each committee may inspect the records, documents, and files of each state department, agency, or office as necessary to perform the committee's duties.

(c) A standing committee is not limited in its legislative endeavors to considering bills, resolutions, or other proposals submitted by individual legislators. Each committee shall search for problems within its jurisdiction and develop, formulate, and recommend passage of any legislative solution the committee believes is desirable.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.015. MEETINGS OF STANDING COMMITTEES. (a) When the legislature is in session, each standing committee shall, if practicable, meet regularly according to applicable legislative requirements and rules of procedure. A committee shall meet at other times determined by the committee.

(b) When the legislature is not in session, each standing committee shall meet as necessary to transact the committee's business. Each committee shall meet in Austin, except that if authorized by rule or resolution of the house creating the committee, the committee may meet in any location in this state that the committee determines necessary. To the extent authorized by rule or resolution, each committee may determine its meeting times.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.016. SPECIAL COMMITTEES. (a) By rule or resolution, each house acting individually or the two houses acting jointly may create special committees.

(b) A special committee shall perform the duties and functions and exercise the powers prescribed by the rule or resolution creating the committee.

(c) Except as limited by the rule or resolution creating the special committee, a special committee shall have and exercise the powers granted under this subchapter to a standing committee. A special committee also has any other powers delegated to it by the rule or resolution creating the committee, subject to the limitations of law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.017. GENERAL INVESTIGATING COMMITTEES. (a) By rule or resolution, each house may create a general investigating committee.

(b) The senate general investigating committee must consist of five senators appointed by the president of the senate. The president of the senate shall designate one committee member as chairman and one committee member as vice chairman.

(c) The house general investigating committee must consist of not fewer than five house members appointed by the speaker. The speaker shall designate one committee member as chairman and one committee member as vice chairman.

(d) Each member serves a term beginning on the date of the member's appointment and ending with the convening of the next regular session following the date of appointment.

(e) If a vacancy occurs on a general investigating committee, the appropriate appointing authority shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy in the same manner as the original appointment.

(f) Members of a general investigating committee are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending committee meetings and engaging in committee work.

(g) All expenses of a general investigating committee, including compensation of the committee's employees and expenses incurred by members, shall be paid out of any appropriation to the legislature under Section 301.029.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1005, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.018. GENERAL INVESTIGATING COMMITTEE MEETINGS. (a) Each general investigating committee may begin work as soon as it desires after its members are appointed. Each general investigating committee created under this subchapter shall meet, organize, and adopt rules of evidence and procedure and any other necessary rules. The committee rules may not conflict with Section 301.025.

(b) Whether or not the legislature is in session, each general investigating committee may meet at any time or place in the state determined necessary by the committee.

(c) Each general investigating committee shall keep a record of its proceedings.

(d) A majority of the members of a general investigating committee constitutes a quorum to transact business.

(e) If the general investigating committees decide not to conduct joint hearings as provided by Section 301.019, the committees shall establish a liaison to fully inform each other of the nature and progress of committee inquiries.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1005, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.019. JOINT GENERAL INVESTIGATING COMMITTEE HEARINGS. (a) On a majority vote of each general investigating committee, the committees may conduct joint hearings and investigations. The committees may adopt joint rules to govern the hearings.

(b) If the general investigating committees conduct joint inquiries or investigations, the chairman of the senate committee shall be the chairman and the chairman of the house committee shall be the vice-chairman.

(c) A majority of the members from each house's committee constitutes a quorum of a joint general investigating committee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.020. POWERS AND DUTIES OF GENERAL INVESTIGATING COMMITTEES. (a) Each general investigating committee may initiate or continue inquiries and hearings concerning:

(1) state government;

(2) any agency or subdivision of government within the state;

(3) the expenditure of public funds at any level of government within the state; and

(4) any other matter the committee considers necessary for the information of the legislature or for the welfare and protection of state citizens.

(b) Each general investigating committee may inspect the records, documents, and files and may examine the duties, responsibilities, and activities of each state department, agency, and officer and of each municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the state.

(c) If a person disobeys a subpoena or other process that a general investigating committee lawfully issues, the committee may cite the person for contempt and cause the person to be prosecuted for contempt according to the procedure prescribed by this chapter or by other law.

(d) Each general investigating committee shall make reports to members of the legislature that the committee determines are necessary and appropriate.

(e) Information held by a general investigating committee is confidential and not subject to public disclosure except as provided by the rules of the house establishing the committee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1005, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.021. GENERAL INVESTIGATING COMMITTEE EMPLOYEES. (a) If for any reason it is necessary to obtain assistance in addition to the services provided by the State Auditor, attorney general, Texas Legislative Council, or Department of Public Safety, each general investigating committee may employ and compensate assistants to assist in any investigation, audit, or legal matter.

(b) Each general investigating committee may employ and compensate clerks, stenographers, and other employees to conduct committee investigations and hearings and keep proper records.

(c) Before a general investigating committee may employ or compensate an employee, the committee must submit the proposed employment to the president of the senate or speaker of the house, as appropriate, for authorization. If the president of the senate or speaker agrees to the proposed employment, he must authorize the employment in writing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.022. TESTIMONY UNDER OATH. (a) All legislative committees shall require witnesses to give testimony under oath, subject to the penalties of perjury.

(b) The oath required by this section may be waived by any committee except a general investigating committee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.0221. USE OF PSEUDONYM BY VICTIMS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING. (a) Each legislative committee shall allow a witness who is the victim of an offense under Section 20A.02 or 20A.03, Penal Code, to give testimony to the committee relating to the witness's experience as a victim of trafficking of persons using a pseudonym instead of the witness's name.

(b) The name of a witness who uses a pseudonym authorized by Subsection (a) is confidential and may not be included in any public records of the committee.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 807 (H.B. 1540), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 301.023. ADMINISTERING OATHS. (a) The following individuals may administer oaths to testifying witnesses:

(1) the president of the senate;

(2) the speaker of the house;

(3) the chairman or acting chairman of a standing or special committee; and

(4) the chairman or acting chairman of a joint committee.

(b) If circumstances require, a member of either house may administer an oath to a witness testifying on a matter pending in the member's house or in a committee of that house.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.024. PROCESS. (a) A general investigating committee may issue process to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, documents, and instruments required by the committee. Any other committee may issue process if authorized by the resolution creating the committee or the rules of procedure of the creating house. A committee may issue process to a witness at any place in this state.

(b) A committee chairman shall issue in the name of the committee all subpoenas and other process as directed by the committee.

(c) If necessary to obtain compliance with a subpoena or other process, a committee may issue writs of attachment.

(d) All process may be addressed to and served by any peace officer of this state or by the sergeant at arms appointed by the committee.

(e) A witness who attends a committee proceeding or a proceeding of either house under process is entitled to the same mileage and per diem as a witness who appears before a grand jury in this state. Mileage and per diem are paid from that house's contingent expense fund or from the contingent expense fund of the committee conducting the proceeding.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.025. REFUSAL TO TESTIFY. (a) A witness called by either house or by a legislative committee does not have a privilege to refuse to testify to a fact or produce a document on the ground that the testimony or document may tend to disgrace the person or otherwise make the person infamous.

(b) The legislature may require a person to testify or produce a document concerning a matter under inquiry before either house or a legislative committee even if the person claims that the testimony or document may incriminate him.

(c) If a person testifies or produces a document while claiming that the testimony or document may incriminate him, the person may not be indicted or prosecuted for any transaction, matter, or thing about which the person truthfully testified or produced evidence.

(d) A witness has a right to counsel when testifying before the legislature or a legislative committee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.026. CONTEMPT OF LEGISLATURE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) has been summoned as a witness to testify or produce papers by either house or any legislative committee; and

(2) refuses to appear, refuses to answer relevant questions, or refuses to produce required books, papers, records, or documents.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000 and by imprisonment for not less than 30 days nor more than 12 months.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.027. PROSECUTION FOR CONTEMPT OF LEGISLATURE. (a) If a person is summoned by either house or any legislative committee as prescribed by Section 301.024 and fails to appear, refuses to answer relevant questions, or fails to produce required books, papers, records, or documents while the legislature is in session, the fact of the failure may be reported to either house. If the legislature is not in session, a statement of facts concerning the failure may be reported to and filed with the president of the senate or speaker of the house.

(b) If the president of the senate or speaker receives a report or statement of facts as provided by Subsection (a), the president of the senate or speaker shall certify the statement of facts to the appropriate prosecuting attorney as provided under Section 411.0253(d) under the seal of the senate or house of representatives, as appropriate.

(c) The prosecuting attorney to whom a statement of facts is certified under Subsection (a) or the prosecutor selected under Section 411.0255, if applicable, shall bring the matter before the grand jury for action. If the grand jury returns an indictment, the prosecuting attorney shall prosecute the indictment.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 1690), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 301.028. COOPERATION OF OTHER AGENCIES. (a) Each standing committee, including a general investigating committee, may request necessary assistance from all state agencies, departments, and offices, including:

(1) the State Auditor;

(2) the Texas Legislative Council;

(3) the Department of Public Safety; and

(4) the attorney general.

(b) Each state agency, department, and office shall assist any legislative committee that requests assistance.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.029. APPROPRIATIONS FOR SALARIES, PER DIEM, AND EXPENDITURES. (a) Each house may pay contingent expenses for the entire term of each member of that house.

(b) Each house may appropriate money to pay all salaries, per diem, and other expenditures authorized by law.

(c) The appropriations to the legislature shall specify separate appropriations for the house of representatives and for the senate.

(d) The comptroller of public accounts shall keep each house's accounts separate and distinct. Unless authorized by law, money in one account may not be transferred to the other account.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.031. COMMITTEE STAFF. From its contingent expense fund, each house may provide for necessary clerks, clerical assistance, and staff to each committee created by that house.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 301.032. GIFTS AND GRANTS. (a) Either house of the legislature may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for the purpose of funding any legislative activity.

(b) Subject to Subsection (c), a committee created by rule or resolution may accept gifts, grants, and donations for purposes of funding the committee's activities unless the rule or resolution prohibits the acceptance.

(c) The acceptance of a gift, grant, or donation under Subsection (b) is not effective until the committee on administration for the appropriate house, or the committees on administration for both houses in the case of acceptance by a joint committee, approves the acceptance.

(d) All gifts, grants, and donations must be accepted in an open meeting by a majority of the voting members of the appropriate body and reported in the public record of the accepting body with the name of the donor and purpose of the gift, grant, or donation.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 617, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 10, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.033. ALLOCATION OF SPACE IN LEGISLATIVE SERVICES BUILDING. (a) The space in the legislative services office building and parking facilities authorized by Chapter 168, Acts of the 74th Legislature, Regular Session, 1995, is allocated to the legislature and legislative agencies for their use. The presiding officers of each house of the legislature shall jointly decide the allocation of the space in the building and facilities.

(b) The building shall be known as the Robert E. Johnson Building.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 301.034. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP ON INTERIM COMMITTEE. (a) A duly appointed senator's or representative's membership on the Legislative Budget Board, Legislative Library Board, Legislative Audit Committee, Texas Legislative Council, or any other interim committee terminates if the member:

(1) resigns the membership;

(2) ceases membership in the legislature for any reason; or

(3) fails to be nominated or elected to the legislature for the next term.

(b) A vacancy created under this section shall be immediately filled by appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

(c) If a member serves on the Legislative Budget Board, Legislative Library Board, or Legislative Audit Committee because of the member's position as chairman of a standing committee, this section does not affect the member's position as chairman of that standing committee.

(d) In filling a vacancy created under this section, the lieutenant governor or the speaker may appoint a senator or representative, as appropriate, other than a committee chairman designated by law to serve as a member of the Legislative Budget Board, Legislative Library Board, Legislative Audit Committee, Texas Legislative Council, or any other interim committee. An appointment made under this subsection does not constitute an appointment to any position other than that of a member of a board, council, or committee covered by this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 301.033 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(13), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 301.035. JOINT INTERIM COMMITTEE PER DIEM AND TRAVEL EXPENSES. Unless a statute expressly provides otherwise, per diem and travel expenses paid to a member of a joint committee established by statute shall be paid by the house to which the member belongs. The per diem and travel expenses paid to a public member of the committee shall be paid by the office of the appointing entity.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. LEGISLATIVE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

Sec. 301.041. COMMUNICATIONS WITH PARLIAMENTARIANS. (a) Communications, including conversations, correspondence, and electronic communications, between a member, officer, or employee of the legislative branch and a parliamentarian appointed by the presiding officer of either house that relate to a request by the member, officer, or employee for information, advice, or opinions from a parliamentarian are confidential and subject to legislative privilege. Information, advice, and opinions given privately by a parliamentarian to a member, officer, or employee of the legislative branch, acting in the member's, officer's, or employee's official capacity, are confidential and subject to legislative privilege. However, the member, officer, or employee of the legislative branch may choose to disclose all or a part of the communications, information, advice, or opinions to which this section applies, and such disclosure does not violate the law of this state.

(b) Records relating to requests made of a parliamentarian appointed under Subsection (a) for assistance, information, advice, or opinion are not public information and are not subject to Chapter 552.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Member, officer, or employee of the legislative branch" includes:

(A) a member, member-elect, or officer of either house of the legislature or of a legislative committee;

(B) an employee of the legislature, including an employee of a legislative agency, office, or committee; and

(C) the lieutenant governor.

(2) "Parliamentarian" includes an employee of a parliamentarian.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 13, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.042. COMMUNICATIONS WITH ENGROSSING AND ENROLLING DEPARTMENT. (a) In this section, "department" means an engrossing and enrolling department maintained by either house of the legislature.

(b) Communications, including conversations, correspondence, and electronic communications, between a member of the legislature or the lieutenant governor, an officer of the house or senate, a legislative agency, office, or committee, or a member of the staff of any of those officers or entities and an assistant or employee of a department that relate to a request by the officer or entity for information, advice, or opinions from an assistant or employee of the department are confidential and subject to legislative privilege.

(c) A communication described by Subsection (b) is subject to attorney-client privilege if:

(1) the assistant or employee of the department who is a party to the communication is a department attorney or is working at the direction of a department attorney;

(2) the communication is given privately; and

(3) the communication is made in connection with the department attorney's provision of legal advice or other legal services.

(d) Information, advice, and opinions given privately by an assistant or employee of a department to a member of the legislature or the lieutenant governor, an officer of the house or senate, a legislative agency, office, or committee, or a member of the staff of any of those officers or entities, when acting in the person's official capacity, are confidential and subject to legislative privilege.

(e) The member of the legislature, lieutenant governor, house or senate officer, or legislative agency, office, or committee may choose to disclose all or a part of the communications, information, advice, or opinions to which this section applies and to which the individual or entity was a party.

(f) This section does not affect the authority of a court to analyze and apply attorney-client privilege under the applicable rules of evidence governing a judicial proceeding.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 13, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.043. ENGROSSING AND ENROLLING DEPARTMENT RECORDS OF DRAFTING AND OTHER REQUESTS. (a) In this section, "department" has the meaning assigned by Section 301.042(a).

(b) Records relating to requests of department staff for the drafting of proposed legislation or for assistance, information, advice, or opinion are:

(1) subject to legislative privilege; and

(2) not public information and not subject to Chapter 552.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 13, eff. June 14, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. LEGISLATIVE PUBLICATIONS

Sec. 301.051. ISSUANCE OF PUBLICATIONS. Either house of the legislature or a legislative agency may produce and sell or distribute publications that the house or agency determines to be of interest to the legislature or the general public. The sales price of a publication shall be designed to recover costs incurred in preparing and issuing the publication.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 301.052. DISTRIBUTION OF JOURNALS. (a) The lieutenant governor and speaker shall each appoint an employee to distribute the journal of the respective houses.

(b) The employee shall distribute a copy of the journal to:

(1) the governor;

(2) each member of the legislature; and

(3) heads of departments, if requested.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Transferred and redesignated from Government Code, Section 301.007 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 14, eff. June 14, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. LEGAL REPRESENTATION OF LEGISLATURE

Sec. 301.061. LEGAL REPRESENTATION OF LEGISLATURE. (a) Subject to the requirements of Subsection (b) and to the exception provided in Subsection (c), the legislature, after notifying and consulting the attorney general, may employ counsel, or authorize the counsel of a legislative agency, to file suits on behalf of the legislature, to intervene in pending litigation on behalf of the legislature, or to otherwise represent the legislature in the courts of this state or in the courts of the United States.

(b) Representation of the legislature under this section is authorized only if:

(1) the speaker and the president of the senate approve the representation in writing; or

(2) both houses by concurrent resolution approve the representation.

(c) Subsection (a) does not apply to the representation of the interests of the legislature before the Supreme Court of Texas in violation of Article IV, Section 22, of the Texas Constitution.

(d) A member of the legislature is immune from civil liability resulting from the legislature's participation in litigation under this section, including liability for attorney fees, costs, and sanctions that may be awarded in the litigation. This subsection is cumulative of the common law immunity applicable to the conduct of members of the legislature.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 753, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER F. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 301.071. SALE OF TEXAS FLAGS AND SIMILAR ITEMS. Either house of the legislature may acquire and provide for the sale of Texas flags and other items carrying symbols of the State of Texas.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 377, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 301.033 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(35), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Transferred and redesignated from Government Code, Section 301.034 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.072. STATE BUILDINGS OCCUPIED BY LEGISLATIVE OFFICES AND AGENCIES. (a) This section applies to a state building that is:

(1) occupied by a legislative office or agency;

(2) located in the Capitol complex, as defined by Section 443.0071; and

(3) not described by Section 2165.007(b)(6).

(b) The presiding officers of each house of the legislature, in consultation with the legislative offices or agencies occupying a state building, shall jointly decide the following with respect to a state building to which this section applies, the building's facilities, and the grounds used by occupants of the building:

(1) the use of space by and allocation of space to a legislative office or agency;

(2) security and building access for a legislative office or agency;

(3) the manner in which a legislative office or agency contracts for a construction or remodeling project involving space allocated to the office or agency; and

(4) the timing and logistics of a maintenance or construction activity involving the building, facilities, or grounds that affects a legislative office or agency.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 17, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 301.073. FACILITIES MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR SPACE OCCUPIED BY LEGISLATURE. (a) In this section, "facilities management services" has the meaning assigned by Section 2165.007, except that the term does not include utility services or utility expenses.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2165.007 or 2165.057(a) or other law and except as otherwise provided by this section, the State Preservation Board is responsible for providing:

(1) for the Sam Houston Building, the facilities management services designated by the administrative head of the senate;

(2) for the John H. Reagan Building, the facilities management services designated by the administrative head of the house;

(3) for an interior portion of the Robert E. Johnson Building occupied by a single legislative agency, the facilities management services designated by the administrative head of that legislative agency; and

(4) for any portion of the Robert E. Johnson Building not covered by Subdivision (3) and for the attached parking facility known as state parking garage P, the facilities management services designated by the administrative head of the Texas Legislative Council in consultation with the other affected legislative agencies occupying space in the building.

(c) The Texas Facilities Commission shall:

(1) provide any facilities management service for a facility listed in Subsection (b) that has not been designated to be performed by the State Preservation Board;

(2) operate and maintain the central utility plant in the Sam Houston Building;

(3) subject to Subdivision (4), operate and maintain the chiller utility plant attached to the Robert E. Johnson Building; and

(4) as part of phase 2 construction of the Capitol Complex master plan developed under Section 2166.105:

(A) connect the Robert E. Johnson Building to the centralized chilled water distribution system described by that plan; and

(B) subsequently decommission the chiller utility plant attached to the Robert E. Johnson Building, except for portions of the plant needed to provide backup chilled water for the building's data center or other critical infrastructure identified by the administrative head of the Texas Legislative Council.

(d) The Texas Facilities Commission shall transfer to the State Preservation Board an amount of money sufficient to reimburse the board for the costs incurred by the board to perform the services described by Subsection (b), including any deferred maintenance project performed by the board.

(e) This section does not, and may not be construed to, specifically commit the control of any public buildings or grounds to the State Preservation Board for purposes of Section 2165.002 or any other law.

(f) The administrative head of the appropriate legislative agency may select an entity to provide construction management and oversight of a project undertaken to repair or rehabilitate a facility described by Subsection (b) that is funded by money appropriated to the State Preservation Board. The entity selected is exclusively responsible for providing construction management and oversight of the project, notwithstanding Section 2165.001, Chapter 2166, or other law. On the request of the administrative head of the legislative agency, from the money appropriated to the State Preservation Board to fund the project, the board shall transfer to the legislative agency the amount of money necessary for the legislative agency to pay the costs the agency incurs in connection with the project.

(g) For the chamber and committee rooms occupied by the house and senate in the Capitol, Capitol Extension, and any legislative office building, the administrative head of agency for the appropriate house shall specify the scope, manner, and performance of all work related to audiovisual systems, including sound systems.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (S.B. 640), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.